Utah statutes.
73-1-13.   Corporations -- One water company may own stock in another.

Any irrigation or reservoir company incorporated and existing under the laws of this state may purchase or subscribe for the capital stock of any other similar corporation which at the time of such purchase or subscription shall be or is about to be incorporated; provided, that such purchase or subscription shall be made only when permitted by the articles of incorporation, and such corporations are hereby permitted and authorized to amend their articles of incorporation so as to authorize such purchase or subscription.



No Change Since 1953

